Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5039YH (8) 91 ak/jh H.F. 2016 Section 1. Section 351.25, Code 2026, is amended by striking 1 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 2 351.25 Dog as property ââ proof of ownership ââ penalties. 3 1. Any dog six months or less of age shall be deemed 4 property, and proof of ownership may be established by any 5 method listed in subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , âcâ , âdâ , âeâ , or 6 âfâ . 7 2. Any dog over six months of age shall be deemed property 8 only if proof of ownership exists, which may be established by 9 any of the following: 10 a. A valid rabies vaccination tag attached to the dogâs 11 collar. 12 b. A tattoo imprinted on the dogâs skin that may be visually 13 observed. 14 c. A device implanted under the dogâs skin that stores 15 information in an electronic format, such as a microchip. 16 Upon apprehension, impoundment, or admission to a shelter, 17 the shelter shall scan across the entire body of the dog to 18 determine if such a device is present to locate the owner 19 of the dog. Prior to adoption, euthanasia, or transfer of 20 ownership or possession of the dog by a shelter, the shelter 21 shall again scan across the entire body of the dog to determine 22 whether the device is present. The shelter shall record 23 and maintain the results of the scan in a written transfer, 24 adoption, or other disposition record. 25 d. A receipt or contract indicating ownership. 26 e. A record of an ongoing patient-client relationship with a 27 veterinarian. 28 f. An otherwise documented history of ownership. 29 3. This section shall not be construed to affect a dog 30 ownerâs duty to comply with the vaccination requirements 31 established in sections 351.33 and 351.35. 32 4. In a legal dispute regarding ownership, a party that 33 provides proof of ownership pursuant to this section is 34 presumed to own the dog. To overcome this presumption, a lack 35 -1- LSB 5039YH (8) 91 ak/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 2016 of ownership must be shown by a preponderance of evidence by 1 the party challenging such ownership. 2 5. Any person who knowingly misrepresents the ownership of 3 a dog to a law enforcement officer or in a legal proceeding is 4 guilty of a simple misdemeanor. 5